Illinois, session 104th, SB1614.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The State Finance Act is amended by changing 5Section 13.3 as follows: 6    (30 ILCS 105/13.3)  (from Ch. 127, par. 149.3)7    Sec. 13.3. Petty cash funds; purchasing cards. 8    (a) Any State agency may establish and maintain petty cash 9funds for the purpose of making change, purchasing items of 10small cost, payment of postage due, and for other nominal 11expenditures which cannot be administered economically and 12efficiently through customary procurement practices.13    Petty cash funds may be established and maintained from 14moneys which are appropriated to the agency for Contractual 15Services. In the case of an agency which receives a single 16appropriation for its ordinary and contingent expenses, the 17agency may establish a petty cash fund from the appropriated 18funds.19    Before the establishment of any petty cash fund, the 20agency shall submit to the State Comptroller a survey of the 21need for the fund. The survey shall also establish that 22sufficient internal accounting controls exist. The Comptroller 23shall investigate such need and if he determines that it   SB1614 Enrolled- 2 -LRB104 10333 HLH 20407 b1exists and that adequate accounting controls exist, shall 2approve the establishment of the fund. The Comptroller shall 3have the power to revoke any approval previously made under 4this Section.5    Petty cash funds established under this Section shall be 6operated and maintained on the imprest system and no fund 7shall exceed $1,000, except that the Department of Revenue may 8maintain a fund not exceeding $2,000 for each Department of 9Revenue facility and the Secretary of State may maintain a 10fund in excess of $1,000, solely for the purpose of making 11change, at any Secretary of State Motor Vehicle Facility of 12not exceeding $2,000 for each Chicago Motor Vehicle Facility, 13each Springfield Public Service Facility, and the Motor 14Vehicle Facilities in Champaign, Decatur, Marion, Naperville, 15Peoria, Rockford, Granite City, Quincy, and Carbondale, to be 16used solely for the purpose of making change. Except for 17purchases made by procurement card as provided in subsection 18(b) of this Section, single transactions shall be limited to 19amounts less than $100, and all transactions occurring in the 20fund shall be reported and accounted for as may be provided in 21the uniform accounting system developed by the State 22Comptroller and the rules and regulations implementing that 23accounting system. All amounts in any such fund of less than 24$1,000 but over $100 shall be kept in a checking account in a 25bank, or savings and loan association or trust company which 26is insured by the United States government or any agency of the   SB1614 Enrolled- 3 -LRB104 10333 HLH 20407 b1United States government, except that all such in funds 2maintained in a each Department of Revenue Facility or in a 3Secretary of State Motor Vehicle Facility , Chicago Motor 4Vehicle Facilities, each Springfield Public Service Facility, 5and the Motor Vehicle Facilities in Champaign, Decatur, 6Marion, Naperville, Peoria, Rockford, Granite City, Quincy, 7and Carbondale, all amounts in the fund may be retained on the 8premises of the facility such facilities.9    No bank or savings and loan association shall receive 10public funds as permitted by this Section, unless it has 11complied with the requirements established pursuant to Section 126 of "An Act relating to certain investments of public funds by 13public agencies", approved July 23, 1943, as now or hereafter 14amended.15    An internal audit shall be performed of any petty cash 16fund which receives reimbursements of more than $5,000 in a 17fiscal year.18    Upon succession in the custodianship of any petty cash 19fund, both the former and successor custodians shall sign a 20statement, in triplicate, showing the exact status of the fund 21at the time of the transfer. The original copy shall be kept on 22file in the office wherein the fund exists, and each signer 23shall be entitled to retain one copy.24    (b) The Comptroller may provide by rule for the use of 25purchasing cards by State agencies to pay for purchases that 26otherwise may be paid out of the agency's petty cash fund. Any   SB1614 Enrolled- 4 -LRB104 10333 HLH 20407 b1rule adopted hereunder shall impose a single transaction 2limit, which shall not be greater than $1,000.3    The rules of the Comptroller may include but shall not be 4limited to:5        (1) standards for the issuance of purchasing cards to 6    State agencies based upon the best interests of the State;7        (2) procedures for recording purchasing card 8    transactions within the State accounting system, which may 9    provide for summary reporting;10        (3) procedures for auditing purchasing card 11    transactions on a post-payment basis;12        (4) standards for awarding contracts with a purchasing 13    card vendor to acquire purchasing cards for use by State 14    agencies; and15        (5) procedures for the Comptroller to charge against 16    State agency appropriations for payment of purchasing card 17    expenditures without the use of the voucher and warrant 18    system.19    (c) As used in this Section, "State agency" means any 20department, officer, authority, public corporation, 21quasi-public corporation, commission, board, institution, 22State college or university, or other public agency created by 23the State, other than units of local government and school 24districts.25(Source: P.A. 103-266, eff. 1-1-24.) 26    Section 99. Effective date. This Act takes effect upon   SB1614 Enrolled- 5 -LRB104 10333 HLH 20407 b1becoming law.